Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,124.01
Acts prohibited; penalty.

A person commits a Class III felony if:

(1) Such person willfully and knowingly performs or causes to be performed any act to:

(a) Apply, remove, damage, or alter an approved nonvisual identifier; or

(b) Expunge, alter, render inaccessible, or otherwise corrupt information recorded or embedded on or in an approved nonvisual identifier; and

(2) Such conduct is done with the intent to deprive an owner of livestock or falsely assert ownership of livestock.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 31.